Hawaii statutes.
§431:21-104 Board of directors. (a)
The board of directors shall have responsibility and control over the
organization, management, policies, and activities of the association. The
board of directors of the association shall consist of twelve persons serving
terms as established in the plan of operation. The board shall be composed of:

(1) Eight voting members selected by the member
insurers;

(2) One voting member appointed by the commissioner
to represent insurance producers; and

(3) Three voting members appointed by the
commissioner to represent the public.

(b) The commissioner shall appoint the initial
members of the board of directors. All member insurers shall be fairly
represented on the board.

(c) Members of the board may be reimbursed from
the assets of the association for reasonable expenses incurred by them as
members of the board of directors. [L 1991, c 284, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 143,
§3; am L 1994, c 128, §9; am L 1996, c 99, §2; am L 2003, c 212, §118]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next